Tennessee statutes. Title 70 Wildlife Resources
Part 3

Wildlife Resources Agency

70-1-301. Creation — Statement of policy.

There is hereby created a wildlife resources agency, which shall have full and exclusive jurisdiction of the duties and functions relating to wildlife formerly held by the game and fish commission or of any other law relating to the management, protection, propagation, and conservation of wildlife, including hunting and fishing, except those powers and duties conferred upon the fish and wildlife commission as provided in § 70-1-206.

It is the policy of the state that the agency shall be nonpartisan and shall place first and foremost the welfare of the wildlife and its environment in the agency's planning and decisions, and to encourage, by every appropriate means, the full development of the state's natural resources to the benefit of all of the citizens of Tennessee, including, but not limited to, the creation of a comprehensive long-range management plan to integrate the wildlife resource agency's efforts and to implement and encourage full utilization of Tennessee's wildlife resources consistent with realistic conservation principles.

Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 2, 4; 1975, ch. 40, § 1; T.C.A., § 51-123; Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Longevity pay for wildlife resources agency wildlife officers, § 8-23-206.

Attorney General Opinions. Municipality unable to prohibit state authorized hunting, OAG 98-038, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (2/9/98).

Delegation of authority by the general assembly to state wildlife agencies, OAG 07-19, 2007 Tenn. AG LEXIS 19 (2/22/07).

70-1-302. Duties and functions — Agency advertising.

The wildlife resources agency is directed and authorized to perform the following duties and functions:

Make such expenditures from funds in the wildlife resources fund and the boating safety fund as it deems advisable subject to titles 9 and 12, and § 70-1-306(c)-(h);

Protect, propagate, increase, preserve and conserve the wildlife of this state, and enforce by proper action and proceedings, the existing laws of this state relating to wildlife;

Acquire by purchase, condemnation, lease, agreement, gift or devise, lands or waters suitable for the following purposes and develop, operate and maintain them for these purposes, subject to § 70-1-306(c)-(h):

Fish hatcheries and nursery ponds;

Lands or waters suitable for game, birds, fish, or fur-bearing animal restoration, propagation, protection, management, or for access to such lands or waters;

Public hunting, fishing or trapping areas to provide places where the public may hunt, trap or fish in accordance with law or the regulations of the agency; and

The protection, preservation, and enhancement of Reelfoot Lake and the lands surrounding it;

Extend and consolidate by exchange lands or waters suitable for the purposes set out in subdivisions (a)(3)(A)-(D);

Capture, propagate, transport, buy, sell, or exchange any species of game, bird, fish, fur-bearing animal or other wildlife needed for propagation, enforcement or stocking purposes, or to exercise control measures of undesirable species;

Enter into cooperative arrangements with farmers and other landowners or lessees for the utilization of lands under their ownership or control for the purpose of protecting, propagating, conserving, restoring, taking or capturing of the wildlife of the state, under such rules and regulations as the agency may prescribe; and

Enter into cooperative agreements with educational institutions and state, federal, and other agencies to promote wildlife management and conservation.

The agency may enter into cooperative agreements with the United States Tennessee Valley authority, United States fish and wildlife service, national park service, United States forest service, or with any other federal agency, or with any state for the purpose of regulating fishing, hunting, or trapping in the area under jurisdiction of the federal agencies or the state or in interstate waters, as the case may be. Such regulations shall become effective as soon as they shall have been accepted by all parties to the agreement and as soon as thirty (30) days shall have elapsed from the first publication of such regulations. Agreements involving reciprocal actions relative to wildlife violations shall become effective thirty (30) days after publication in the same manner as is required for proclamations.

The wildlife resources agency may require creel census reports and reports of all fish taken under commercial fishing license and all mussels taken under commercial musseling license for any water or waters designated by it, such reports to be on forms provided by the executive director. This shall apply to license holders, wholesalers and others as required.

The wildlife resources agency shall administer the Reelfoot Lake natural area, as provided in title 11, chapter 14, part 1.

In order to further the public interest in the protection and preservation of wildlife and its habitat, the wildlife resources agency is authorized to participate in the federal wetlands mitigation banking program. Participation includes, but is not limited to, entering into agreements for agency or private development, construction and operation on lands that are affected by the program and that are owned, leased, or controlled in some manner through cooperative arrangement agreement or otherwise by the agency.

The agency may sell advertising in any magazine or other publication of the agency, under terms and conditions to be set by the agency. The revenue generated from such advertising shall be deposited exclusively in the wildlife resources fund provided in § 70-1-401. Any person or entity purchasing such advertising shall include an appropriate disclaimer, as determined by and subject to approval of the agency, to ensure that the appearance of such advertising in an agency publication does not constitute, directly or indirectly, any endorsement by the agency of any products, services, companies, organizations, or other matters referenced in the advertising.

The agency may sell the right to include advertising in mailings sent by the agency, including, but not limited to, licenses, under terms and conditions set by the agency; provided, that any advertisers must comply with the disclaimer requirements of subsection (f). The revenue generated from such advertising shall be deposited exclusively in the wildlife resources fund provided in § 70-1-401.

The agency is authorized to enter into agreements with landowners or persons who control hunting access to lands to establish deer management assistance plans. The purpose of a plan is to permit a landowner, adjoining landowners, or persons who control hunting access on contiguous lands to achieve deer management goals on the contiguous land through management for the specific needs of deer that may at any point in time cross over the land. Harvests under a particular deer management plan may exceed the normal season harvest in accordance with the plan.

General guidelines for implementation of a deer management assistance program shall be developed by rule and regulation. In order to qualify under the program, the total combined contiguous acreage must meet or exceed one thousand (1,000) acres. Further, a deer management assistance permit must be purchased. Permit fees shall be established by rule and regulation. It is the intent in creating this program that it shall be revenue neutral to the agency and the state.

The agency is authorized to enter into agreements with the United States coast guard to enforce federal regulations in connection with homeland security related activities on Tennessee waters; however, all enforcement activities are subject to prior approval by the Tennessee office of homeland security.

The agency may enter into cooperative agreements with the United States Tennessee Valley authority, United States fish and wildlife service, national park service, United States forest service, or with any other federal agency, or with any public or private landowners in this state for the purpose of creating partnerships for the purpose of planting cover and food plots along utility easements for the benefit of indigenous wildlife.

The wildlife resources agency is authorized to enter into partnership agreements with nonprofit organizations for the purpose of promoting and supporting the goals and objectives of the agency including, but not limited to, marketing opportunities.

This subsection (k) shall not be interpreted to abridge any powers or duties delegated to the agency in this part.

The nonprofit partners shall have their boards of directors elected by a process approved by the governor or the governor's designee.

The nonprofit partners shall be properly incorporated under the laws of this state, and approved by the internal revenue service as organizations that are exempt from federal income tax under § 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(a)), by virtue of being organizations described in § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)).

Costs to underwrite the nonprofit partners' activities related to marketing opportunities shall be borne from revenues of the nonprofit partners and no state employee shall benefit from such proceeds. All proceeds in excess of the cost of operation shall be deposited exclusively into the wildlife resources fund as established in § 70-1-401 and shall not revert to the general fund.

The nonprofit partners shall annually submit to the governor, the speakers of the senate and the house of representatives, and the chair of the Tennessee fish and wildlife commission, within ninety (90) days after the end of their fiscal year, a complete and detailed report setting forth their operation and accomplishments.

The annual reports and all books of accounts and financial records of all funds received by grant, contract or otherwise from state, local or federal sources shall be subject to audit annually by the comptroller of the treasury. With prior approval of the comptroller of the treasury, the audit may be performed by a licensed independent public accountant selected by the nonprofit partner. If an independent public accountant is employed, the audit contract between the nonprofit partner and the independent accountant shall be on contract forms prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. The cost of any audit shall be paid by the nonprofit partner. The comptroller of the treasury shall ensure that audits are prepared in accordance with generally accepted governmental auditing standards and determine if the audits meet minimum audit standards prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury. No audit may be accepted as meeting the requirements of this section until approved by the comptroller of the treasury.

All full board meetings of a nonprofit organization concerning activities authorized by § 70-1-207 or pursuant to subsection (f) shall be open to the public, except for executive sessions that include, but are not limited to, any of the following matters: litigation; audits or investigations; human resource issues; gift acceptance deliberations; board training; governance; donor strategy sessions; and security measures.

All expenditures of a nonprofit organization relating to activities authorized by § 70-1-207 or pursuant to subsection (f) shall be open for public inspection upon specific request to the nonprofit organization.

Acts 1951, ch. 115, § 26 (Williams, § 5178.55); impl. am. Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 5-7; Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 21; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-109, 51-124; Acts 1984, ch. 548, § 3; 1985, ch. 350, § 4; 1990, ch. 891, §§ 1-3; 1995, ch. 298, § 1; 1999, ch. 227, § 1; 2000, ch. 837, § 1; 2002, ch. 566, § 1; 2004, ch. 774, § 1; 2008, ch. 859, § 1; 2011, ch. 332, § 1; 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Penalty provisions, § 70-6-103.

Reelfoot Lake natural area, administration, § 11-14-116.

Attorney General Opinions. Prerequisites to commencement of programs or projects, OAG 95-009, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 9 (3/3/95).

Municipality unable to prohibit state authorized hunting, OAG 98-038, 1998 Tenn. AG LEXIS 38 (2/9/98).

70-1-303. Executive director — Appointment — Qualifications — Salary.

The office of executive director of the wildlife resources agency is hereby created. The executive director shall be appointed by the fish and wildlife commission and shall serve at the pleasure of the commission. In the selection of an executive director, preference should be given to candidates with a bachelor of science degree in wildlife management or a related field and who are familiar with wildlife management practices and the administration of wildlife programs.

The salary of the executive director shall be determined by the fish and wildlife commission. The salary of the executive director, once hired, shall not be reduced during that officer's tenure as executive director and shall not exceed the salary received by the commissioner of environment and conservation. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 6; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(83); 1978, ch. 509, § 1; 1980, ch. 632, § 1; T.C.A., § 51-125; Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Commissioner of environment and conservation, salary, § 8-23-101.

70-1-304. Duties of executive director.

The executive director shall:

Be the head of the wildlife resources agency under the direction and supervision of the commission and shall have exclusive supervisory control of the agency;

Serve as recording secretary for the commission and shall be custodian of all minutes and all records of the commission;

At the proper time or times publish, in accordance with the rules, regulations, policies and procedures of the state publications committee, the wildlife resources laws in pamphlet form, preferably in size convenient for the pocket, for general distribution and information; and

Perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the commission or by law, but shall have no authority to make rules or regulations other than those governing the conduct of the employees of the wildlife resources agency.

Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 7, 14; T.C.A., §§ 51-126, 51-133; Acts 1990, ch. 1024, § 35.

Cross-References. Penalty provisions, § 70-6-103.

Powers regarding wetlands, title 11, ch. 14, part 4.

70-1-305. Powers of executive director.

The executive director of the wildlife resources agency has the power to:

Enforce all laws relating to wildlife, and to go upon any property, outside of buildings, posted or otherwise, in the performance of the executive director's duties;

Execute all warrants and search warrants for the violation of the laws relating to wildlife;

Serve subpoenas issued for the examination, investigation and trial of all offenses against the law relating to wildlife;

Arrest without warrant any person found in the act of violating any of the provisions of this title;

Offer rewards or payments for information that may aid in the conviction of any offender violating any section, or sections, of this title or any other law relating to wildlife;

Enforce any other law as directed by the general assembly;

In connection with this duty, in view of the vast expanse of isolated wildlife habitat extant throughout the state, and to facilitate the effective protection of public and private rights and property, particularly in, but not limited to, these isolated areas, the executive director shall, in addition to the authority otherwise conferred by law, be vested with authority to arrest, without warrant or process of any kind, any person committing or attempting to commit a criminal offense in violation of any of the laws of this state if the offense is committed on public lands, rights-of-way or waters under the agency's management or control through lease, cooperative agreement or otherwise;

Designate employees of the agency, officers of any other state or of the federal government who are full-time wildlife enforcement personnel, to perform the duties and have the powers as prescribed in this section except subdivision (9);

Arrest without warrant any person observed dumping or throwing litter or debris in the lakes, rivers, or on public property in the state;

Accept on behalf of the agency gifts of personal property upon such terms and conditions and for such uses and purposes as may be agreed by the donor of the personal property and the executive director;

Arrest without warrant any person who violates the prohibited uses of waters posted pursuant to § 69-3-107(15). The power granted pursuant to this subdivision (10) does not include the authority to investigate violations of the Water Quality Control Act, compiled in title 69, chapter 3, part 1;

Exercise the powers of the commissioner of environment and conservation, as provided in title 11, chapter 14, part 1, with respect to the administration of the Reelfoot Lake natural area; and

Suspend or reinstate a hunting, fishing or trapping privilege after affording proper due process, pursuant to the terms of any § 70-1-302 agreement involving reciprocal actions relative to wildlife violations.

Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 8; 1975, ch. 43, § 1; 1982, ch. 738, § 2; 1982, ch. 917, § 2; T.C.A., § 51-127; Acts 1984, ch. 548, § 4; 1990, ch. 696, § 1; 1990, ch. 891, §§ 4, 5; 1999, ch. 227, § 2; 2017, ch. 148, § 2.

Cross-References. Penalty provisions, § 70-6-103.

Reelfoot Lake natural area, administration, § 11-14-116.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of TWRA Officers to Enforce Local Noise Ordinances on Waters by Agreement with Local Law Enforcement Agency. OAG 15-68, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 69 (9/23/15).

70-1-306. Purchases and expenditures — Budget — Employment and compensation of personnel.

The expenses incurred by the agency for any purpose or in consequence of this chapter shall be limited to the amount of money in the wildlife resources fund. In no event shall the state pay or be liable, in any manner, for the expenses of the agency, except to the extent of the wildlife resources fund, and the commissioner of finance and administration shall not issue any voucher or warrant for any services or expenses of any kind unless a sufficient amount remains to the credit of the wildlife resources fund.

Expenditures from the wildlife resources fund for the purchase of real property shall be made in the name of the state for the use and benefit of the wildlife resources agency and expenditures made for the purchase of personal property shall be made in the name of the wildlife resources agency. Upon disposal by sale of any property, both real and personal, proceeds derived from the sale shall be deposited in the wildlife resources fund.

The fish and wildlife commission shall approve the budget, including any amendments to the budget, for the administration of this title for each fiscal year.

All funds to the credit of the agency shall be drawn by the executive director of the wildlife resources agency by warrant upon the department of finance and administration and such warrant shall have attached to the warrant or contained in the warrant an itemized statement as to what the warrant covers.

All purchases and expenditures are subject to titles 9 and 12.

The agency shall not contract any indebtedness or obligations beyond the funds available to its use.

The executive director is further granted the power and authority to fix the compensation of all employees under the executive director's jurisdiction, and is authorized to hire and dismiss such personnel as the executive director deems necessary to carry out this title, subject to the approval of the department of human resources.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 10, 12; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(83); T.C.A., §§ 51-129, 51-131; Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Penalty provisions, § 70-6-103.

70-1-307. Annual financial report.

It is the duty of the executive director, on or before September 15 of each year, to prepare and present to the governor and each member of the fish and wildlife commission an annual report showing what has been expended by the agency during the year immediately preceding, the amount of moneys received and from what source and the amount expended and for what purposes.

The governor shall present copies of such reports as the governor may deem necessary to the next convening general assembly.

Acts 1974, ch. 481, § 13; T.C.A., § 51-132; Acts 2012, ch. 993, § 13.

Cross-References. Penalty provisions, § 70-6-103.

70-1-308. Political activity prohibited — Carrying of firearms authorized — Retention by retired personnel.

No employee or officer of the agency shall take any active part in political management or in political campaigns, nor shall such employee or officer use official authority or influence for the purpose of interfering with an election or affecting the results of an election, or for the purpose of coercing the political action of any person or body.

It is lawful for the commissioned personnel of the wildlife resources agency, regularly employed by the agency, acting through its executive director, to wear or carry pistols or other firearms.

After twenty-five (25) years of honorable service by a commissioned employee, the wildlife resources agency shall authorize the employee, upon retirement, to retain such employee's service weapon in recognition of the employee's many years of good and faithful service. A commissioned employee who retires on disability retirement also may be authorized to retain that employee's service weapon.

Acts 1949, ch. 50, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 5178.8 (Williams, § 5120.27); Acts 1974, ch. 481, §§ 11, 21; Acts 1980, ch. 634, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 51-112, 51-130, 51-142.

Cross-References. Penalty provisions, § 70-6-103.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 89-20, 1989 Tenn. AG LEXIS 128 (2/13/89).

70-1-309. Salary administration plan.

The department of human resources and the Tennessee wildlife resources agency shall develop a salary administration plan for the agency's officers, biologists, and other positions unique to the agency. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, upon approval of the commissioners of finance and administration and human resources and the director of the Tennessee wildlife resources agency, such salary administration plan shall be implemented during the 1996-1997 fiscal year. Implementation of salary increases pursuant to such salary administration plan shall be suspended for the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2003, and ending June 30, 2004, and beginning July 1, 2009, and ending June 30, 2010. In the fiscal years beginning July 1, 2004, and July 1, 2010, and in subsequent fiscal years, salary increases pursuant to the salary administration plan shall not include time of service between July 1, 2003, and June 30, 2004, nor between July 1, 2009, and June 30, 2010.

The salary increase provided by this section and suspended by subsection (a) for the period July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2004, shall be reinstated effective July 1, 2017. For purposes of determining the appropriate salary classification pursuant to this section, credible service for the time period of July 1, 2003, through June 30, 2004, shall be included.

Acts 1996, ch. 917, § 1; 2003, ch. 355, § 50; 2009, ch. 531, § 29; 2017, ch. 461, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 917, § 2 provides that no state general funds shall be expended to fund the provisions of this section.

Acts 2003, ch. 355, § 66 provided that no expenditure of public funds pursuant to the act shall be made in violation of the provisions of Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, as codified in 42 U.S.C. § 2000d.

For the Preamble to the act concerning the operation and funding of state government and to fund the state budget for the fiscal years beginning on July 1, 2008, and July 1, 2009, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 531.

70-1-310. Submission of fine in lieu of court appearance — Arrest or judgment of forfeiture possible.

Whenever a person is issued a citation pursuant to § 40-7-118 for a misdemeanor violation of any provision of this title, title 69, chapter 9, or for any offense for which an arrest is authorized pursuant to this title, prior to the time set for the person to appear in court to answer the charge, the person cited may, in lieu of appearance in court, submit the fine and costs to the clerk of the court. The submission to fine must be with the approval of the court that has jurisdiction of such offense within the county in which the offense charged is alleged to have been committed. The submission to fine shall not otherwise be exclusive of any other method or procedure prescribed by law for disposition of a citation.

If the person cited has not paid the citation upon submission to fine as provided in subsection (a) and the person cited fails to appear in court at the time specified, or such later date as may be fixed by the court, the court may issue a warrant for such person's arrest or may declare a judgment of forfeiture of the offense charged. The judgment of forfeiture shall in no case be more than the total amount of fine and costs prescribed by law for the offense and may be collected in the manner provided in § 40-24-105.

This section shall not be applicable to any person arrested for a violation of any provision of this title, title 69, chapter 9, or any offense for which an arrest is authorized pursuant to this title, which is punishable by a fine of more than fifty dollars ($50.00) or by imprisonment for more than thirty (30) days. This section shall not supersede § 40-7-118, nor shall they require the use of a citation in lieu of continued custody of an arrested person in any of the circumstances specified in § 40-7-118(d).

Acts 2001, ch. 249, § 4.

70-1-311. Qualifications for position of wildlife officer.

For purposes of qualifying for the position of wildlife officer with the wildlife resources agency, at least ten (10) years of full-time work experience in wildlife or fisheries management, wildlife biology, or other related work experience in this state or another state may be credited as equivalent to a bachelor's degree from an accredited college or university in wildlife or fisheries management, wildlife biology, or other related acceptable field. This section shall apply to any person who submitted an application for the position of wildlife officer prior to, or on or after, May 20, 2016.

Acts 2016, ch. 1084, § 1.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 70-1-311, concerning a special joint legislative study committee regarding improvements to the Tennessee wildlife resources agency, was deleted as obsolete by the code commission in 2012.